West Virginia, session 2025, HB3215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. FIRE MARSHAL. §15A-10-26. Early detection cancer screening pilot program for active and retired firefighters. (a) The State Fire Marshal and the Department of Health shall jointly establish the firefighter early detection screening pilot program.(b) All active and retired permanent firefighters shall be offered a comprehensive early detection cancer screening that consists of: a blood test, an ultrasound of vital organs, a lung CT if indicated, and a skin cancer screening.(c) Vendors with the ability to test for the following shall be preferred:(I) A multi-cancer blood test that detects signals from as many cancer types as possible, including those that are commonly unscreened; and (2) An ultrasound diagnostic that screens, at minimum: abdominal aorta, thyroid, liver, gallbladder, spleen, bladder, kidney, testicles, exterior pelvis for females, as well as an echocardiogram and a carotid doppler.(d) (1) The funding for the administration of the pilot program and cost of testing shall be provided by the state.	Any unexpended funds shall not be expired until the termination of the pilot program.  (2) Funds shall be disbursed upon submission of forms as presented in the plan outlined in paragraph IV and adopted by the Secretary of Homeland Security, and with the approval of, the Governor.(3) Within 90 days of the effective date of this section, a committee consisting of representatives appointed by the Governor from the Professional Fire Fighters of West Virginia, the West Virginia Association of Fire Chiefs, a representative of municipal firefighters and the state fire marshal, with oversight from the secretary of homeland security or his or her designee, the commission shall present to the secretary of homeland security and the governor their initial plan to administer the program, which shall consist of:(A) Known vendors who can provide appropriate screenings;(B) Location and time to provide screenings; and(C) Administrative requirements to:(i) Notify members of opportunity for the screenings.(ii) Register and screen members.(iii) Document findings; and(iv) Provide ongoing recommendations to the Legislature.(e) Firefighter participation in cancer screenings shall be optional and a firefighter shall be eligible to receive any combination of offered screenings, not to exceed a cost of $1,300 per individual.(f)  Expenditure of funds shall be made available for not more than 24 months from the date of a plan approval by the Governor and/or council and funds have been made available to administer early-detection cancer screening services unless the Governor grants a request for an extension.(g) Any active or retired firefighter meeting the requirements herein, who self-funds any portion of the above screenings after January 1, 2025 may submit for reimbursement of such costs, not to exceed $1,300 from the pilot program, only during the period of time that funds are made available. The firefighter must submit required documentation for reimbursement.(h) The committee authorized in subdivision (d)(3) of this section shall present their findings to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates  after 12 months and after 24 months of the pilot program's administration. Findings shall include: number of firefighters screened; tests conducted; results of tests; trends; and any recommendations for the pilot program.(i) All providers of services shall ensure the names and any other personally identifiable information of the individual is removed prior to providing results to the committee.(j) The State Fire Marshal and the Secretary of the Department of Health shall jointly propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to administer the provisions of this section.(k) Effective Date. This section shall take effect July 1, 2025.